Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-444
Entry permit program; commission; rules and regulations; enforce.

(1) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as are necessary to administer the entry permit program and to carry out the purposes and intents of sections 37-434 to 37-446.

(2) The commission, its agents and officers, and any other peace officer of this state shall be empowered to enforce the provisions of sections 37-434 to 37-446.

Laws 1977, LB 81, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1112;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 154;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 39.